Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1948
Voluntary surrender of license.

A licensee may
voluntarily surrender a license issued under the Children's Residential Facilities
and Placing Licensure Act at any time, except that the department may refuse
to accept a voluntary surrender of a license if the licensee is under investigation
or if the department has initiated disciplinary action against the licensee.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 25.